Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 24 Amercement

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

70 Am. Jur. 2d Sheriffs, Police and Constables §§ 230, 234.

Disqualification of judge because of pecuniary interest in amercement, 72 ALR3d 375.

80 C.J.S. Sheriffs and Constables §§ 359 to 385.

§ 1-24-101.
Causes for amercement.

On motion in court and notice in writing as provided in W.S.

1-24-102

, an officer shall be amerced in the amount of the judgment including costs, and ten percent (10%) thereon for the plaintiff or defendant when:

An execution or order of sale is directed and delivered to him to be executed, and he neglects or refuses to execute it;

He neglects or refuses to sell any property which by any writ or order he is directed to sell;

He fails to call an inquest, or to return to the clerk’s office a copy of the certificate of inquisition made by the inquest;

He neglects to return to the proper court on or before the return day an execution or order of sale directed and delivered to him;

He neglects to return a correct inventory of personal property taken on execution, unless he returns that the amount of the judgment, including costs, has been paid to him;

He neglects, on demand, to pay to the person entitled thereto, any money collected or received by him for the use of such person, at any time after he collects or receives the same; or

He neglects or refuses to pay to the judgment debtor on demand all money received by him on any sale made beyond what is sufficient to satisfy the writ or order of sale, with interest and costs.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 594; R.S. 1887, § 2942; R.S. 1899, § 4061; C.S. 1910, § 4921; C.S. 1920, § 6191; R.S. 1931, § 89-3701; C.S. 1945, § 3-5201; W.S. 1957, § 1-732; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-25-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Sheriff's actions in execution sale within scope of chapter.
—

In an execution sale the actions of the sheriff are circumscribed by statutes and he is subject to amercement. Eggeman v. Western Nat'l Bank, 596 P.2d 318,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 1-24-102.
Notice of motion for amercement.

If the officer resides
in the county in which the motion is made, the notice shall be served
upon him at least two (2) days before the motion is heard. If he is
an officer of another county, the notice shall be served upon him
or left at his office at least fifteen (15) days before the motion
is heard, or sent to him by certified mail at least sixty (60) days
before the motion is heard.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 595; R.S. 1887, § 2943; R.S. 1899, § 4062; C.S. 1910, § 4922; C.S. 1920, § 6192; R.S. 1931, § 89-3702; C.S. 1945, § 3-5202; W.S. 1957, § 1-733; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-25-102

.

§ 1-24-103.
Amercement for failure to serve or return process.

If an officer fails to
execute any summons or other process directed to him, or to return
the same as required by law, unless he is prevented by unavoidable
accident from doing so, he shall be amerced, upon motion and notice
in writing as provided by law in a sum not exceeding one thousand
dollars ($1,000.00) and be liable to the action of any person aggrieved
by the failure. He is not liable to an action or amercement for failure
to execute any process directed to him from any county other than
that in which he was elected unless his fees are deposited with the
clerk who issued the process and an endorsement of that fact is made
and subscribed by the clerk on the process at the time of its issue.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 596; R.S. 1887, § 2944; R.S. 1899, § 4063; C.S. 1910, § 4923; C.S. 1920, § 6193; R.S. 1931, § 89-3703; C.S. 1945, § 3-5203; W.S. 1957, § 1-734; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-25-103

.

§ 1-24-104.
Amercement of clerks of court.

If a clerk of court neglects
or refuses on demand to pay to the person entitled thereto any money
received by him in his official capacity for the use of that person,
he may be amerced, on motion and notice as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 597; R.S. 1887, § 2945; R.S. 1899, § 4064; C.S. 1910, § 4924; C.S. 1920, § 6194; R.S. 1931, § 89-3704; C.S. 1945, § 3-5204; W.S. 1957, § 1-735; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-25-104

.

§ 1-24-105.
Amount of amercement for not paying over money.

When the cause of amercement
is the refusal to pay over money collected, the officer shall not
be amerced in a greater sum than the amount withheld, with ten percent
(10%) thereon.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 598; R.S. 1887, § 2946; R.S. 1899, § 4065; C.S. 1910, § 4925; C.S. 1920, § 6195; R.S. 1931, § 89-3705; C.S. 1945, § 3-5205; W.S. 1957, § 1-736; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-25-105.

§ 1-24-106.
Surety of officer may be made party to judgment.

A surety of an officer
may be made party to a judgment of amercement against the officer,
but the goods, chattels, lands and tenements of the surety are not
liable to execution when sufficient goods, chattels, lands and tenements
of the officer against whom judgment is rendered can be found to satisfy
the execution. Either party may proceed against the officer by attachment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 599; R.S. 1887, § 2947; R.S. 1899, § 4066; C.S. 1910, § 4926; C.S. 1920, § 6196; R.S. 1931, § 89-3706; C.S. 1945, § 3-5206; W.S. 1957, § 1-737; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-25-106.

Cross references. —

As to attachment following judgment generally, see §§

1-17-301

to

1-17-345

.

As to rights and remedies of surety upon paying judgment, see §

38-1-104

.

§ 1-24-107.
Officer may have execution on original judgment.

If an officer who is
amerced has not collected the amount of the original judgment, he
may sue out an execution and collect for his own use the amount of
the judgment, in the name of the original plaintiff.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 600; R.S. 1887, § 2948; R.S. 1899, § 4067; C.S. 1910, § 4927; C.S. 1920, § 6197; R.S. 1931, § 89-3707; C.S. 1945, § 3-5207; W.S. 1957, § 1-738; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-25-107.